Utah statutes.
26-8a-405.1.   Selection of provider by political subdivision.
(1) (a)  Only an applicant approved under Section 26-8a-405 may respond to a
request for a proposal issued in accordance with Section 26-8a-405.2 or
Section 26-8a-405.4 by a political subdivision.
(b)  A response to a request for proposal is subject to the maximum rates
established by the department under Section 26-8a-403.
(c)  A political subdivision may award a contract to an applicant in response
to a request for proposal:
(i)  in accordance with Section 26-8a-405.2; and
(ii)  subject to Subsection (2).
(2) (a)  The department shall issue a license to an applicant selected by a
political subdivision under Subsection (1) unless the department finds that
issuing a license to that applicant would jeopardize the health, safety, and
welfare of the citizens of the geographic service area.
(b)  A license issued under this Subsection (2):
(i)  is for the exclusive geographic service area approved by the department
in accordance with Subsection 26-8a-405.2(2);
(ii)  is valid for four years;
(iii)  is not subject to a request for license from another applicant under
the provisions of Sections 26-8a-406 through 26-8a-409 during the four-year
term, unless the applicant's license is revoked under Section 26-8a-504; and
(iv)  is subject to supervision by the department under Sections 26-8a-503 and
26-8a-504.
(3)  Except as provided in Subsection 26-8a-405.3(4)(a), the provisions of
Sections 26-8a-406 through 26-8a-409 do not apply to a license issued under
this section.
